District of Columbia statutes.
7-1203.06

Redisclosure.

Mental health information disclosed pursuant to this subchapter shall not be redisclosed except as specifically authorized by subchapter II, III or IV of this chapter or for the purposes of and in accordance with Chapter 2B of this title [§ 7-241 et seq.].

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 306, 25 DCR 5055
Dec. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-273, § 204(c), 57 DCR 7171
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 53(b)(1), 59 DCR 6190
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 204(c) of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 204(c) of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-530, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8099).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.
D.C. Law 18-273 substituted “of this chapter or for the purposes of and in accordance with Chapter 2A of this title” for “of this chapter”.
1973 Ed., § 6-1627.
1981 Ed., § 6-2026.